Georgia, session 2025_26, SB16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 11 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to miscellaneous
offenses concerning public officers and employees, is amended by revising Code
Section 45-11-8, relating to engaging in bail bond business, as follows:
"45-11-8.
(a)(1) It shall be unlawful for any elected official, officer of the court, law enforcement
officer, or attorney in this state to engage either directly or indirectly in the bail bond
business. For purposes of this Code section paragraph, the term 'elected official' shall not
include a person who is elected to as a member of the local school board or the governing
authority of a county, municipal corporation, or consolidated government.
S. B. 16
- 1 -

LC 55 0399
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person who is a member of the governing authority of a
county, municipal corporation, or consolidated government to engage either directly or
indirectly in the bail bond business within the jurisdiction of the county, municipal
corporation, or consolidated government where such person holds office.
(b) Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 16
- 2 -